Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,116
Appropriation; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate ten million dollars from the Education Future Fund to carry out the Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and Retention Act.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 48.
January 1, 2028